District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-701

Acquisition of land restricted.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1282, ch. 854, § 587
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(6), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-701.
1981 Ed., § 29-901.
1973 Ed., § 29-501.